Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202685-3112
Excellence in Teaching Cash Fund; created; use; investment.

(1) The Excellence in Teaching Cash Fund is created. The fund shall consist of transfers by the Legislature, transfers pursuant to section 79-3501, and loan repayments, penalties, and interest payments received in the course of administering the Attracting Excellence to Teaching Program and the Enhancing Excellence in Teaching Program.

(2)(a) For all fiscal years beginning on and after July 1, 2024, the commission shall allocate on an annual basis up to two hundred fifty thousand dollars of the funds transferred pursuant to section 79-3501 for grants to teachers pursuant to the Career-Readiness and Dual-Credit Education Grant Program.

(b) For all fiscal years beginning on and after July 1, 2024, the commission shall allocate on an annual basis up to five hundred thousand dollars of the funds transferred pursuant to section 79-3501 exclusively for loans to any eligible student who is enrolling in a student-teaching semester during the award year pursuant to the Attracting Excellence to Teaching Program. The funds shall be distributed to all eligible institutions according to the distribution formula as determined by rule and regulation. The eligible institutions shall act as agents of the commission in the distribution of the funds to any eligible student for a student-teaching semester.

(c) Of the funds remaining in the Excellence in Teaching Cash Fund after the distributions pursuant to subdivisions (a) and (b) of this subsection, for all fiscal years, the commission shall allocate on an annual basis up to four hundred thousand dollars in the aggregate of the funds to be distributed for the Attracting Excellence to Teaching Program to all eligible institutions according to the distribution formula as determined by rule and regulation. The eligible institutions shall act as agents of the commission in the distribution of the funds for the Attracting Excellence to Teaching Program to eligible students. The commission shall allocate on an annual basis up to eight hundred thousand dollars of the remaining available funds to be distributed to eligible students for the Enhancing Excellence in Teaching Program. Funding amounts granted in excess of one million two hundred thousand dollars shall be evenly divided for distribution between the two programs.

(3) Transfers may be made from the Excellence in Teaching Cash Fund to the Education Future Fund at the direction of the Legislature. Any money in the Excellence in Teaching Cash Fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 2000, LB 1399, § 19;

Laws 2001, Spec. Sess., LB 3, § 6;

R.S.1943, (2008), § 79-8,136;

Laws 2009, LB547, § 12;

Laws 2011, LB333, § 8;

Laws 2014, LB967, § 10;

Laws 2015, LB519, § 9;

Laws 2021, LB528, § 34;

R.S.Supp.,2022, § 79-8,137.05;

Laws 2023, LB705, § 24;

Laws 2024, LB1284, § 20;

Laws 2026, LB1072, § 228.
April 8, 2026
Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.